California statutes. Food and Agricultural Code
12828.5.

(a) A registrant at any time may request that the registration of any of its pesticides be voluntarily canceled. The request shall be in writing and shall include a waiver of the registrant’s right to a hearing on the cancellation.

(b) The director shall mail a notice of cancellation of registration of the pesticides to the registrant. The notice shall specify the effective date of the cancellation.

(c) The pesticides for which the registration is canceled may be sold and possessed as if the product’s registration was not renewed unless the director determines that protection of human health or the environment require otherwise, in which case the cancellation notice shall specify the conditions under which the product may be sold or possessed after cancellation of its registration.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 361, Sec. 46.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

12829.

If a person has a research authorization for a pesticide issued pursuant to Section 6260 of Title 3 of the California Code of Regulations for the purpose of testing the pesticide, and the produce on which the pesticide was tested is required to be destroyed, any actual costs incurred by the commissioner to investigate and confirm the destruction of the produce shall be paid for by the person who has the research authorization. The costs charged by the commissioner shall not exceed one hundred twenty-five dollars ($125) per testsite. The board of supervisors of each county may adopt a fee schedule to cover the commissioner’s costs under this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 361, Sec. 47.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

12832.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, alfalfa and all vegetable crops, when grown for seed production, with the exception of corn, beans, pumpkin, and peas, shall be considered a nonfood and nonfeed site of pesticide use for the purpose of pesticide registration. In order to be determined to be a nonfood or nonfeed site for the purposes of this section, the following conditions shall be met:

(1) All seed screenings shall be disposed of in such a way that they cannot be distributed or used for food or feed. The seed conditioner shall keep records of screenings disposal for three years from the date of disposal and shall furnish the records to the director upon request. Disposal records shall consist of documentation from a controlled waste disposal site, incinerator, cogeneration plant, composting facility, or other equivalent disposal site.

(2) No portion of the seed plant, including, but not limited to, green chop, hay, pellets, meal, whole seed, cracked seed, or seed screenings shall be used or distributed for food or feed purposes.

(3) All seed crops grown on a nonfood or nonfeed site in this state, or conditioned in this state, shall bear a tag or container label that forbids the use of the seed for human consumption or animal feed.

(4) No seed grown on a nonfood or nonfeed site in this state, or conditioned in this state, may be distributed for human consumption or animal feed.

(b) Nothing in this section prevents the department from imposing conditions for alfalfa seed sites in addition to those contained in this section, or from rescinding any current label requirements for pesticides approved for alfalfa seed production.

(c) Nothing in this section exempts the department from reviewing worker safety evaluations with regard to the use of pesticides involving crops specified in subdivision (a).

(d) A violation of any condition specified in subdivision (a) by the person responsible for the use of the pesticide is a violation of this chapter, and is subject to the civil and criminal penalties and injunctive relief provisions specified in Article 12 (commencing with Section 12996). A violation of any condition specified in subdivision (a) by the person responsible for the disposition of seed screenings is a violation of Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 14901) and is subject to enforcement by the Department of Food and Agriculture.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 361, Sec. 48.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

12833.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, the director may issue a certificate of emergency registration for a pesticide if all of the following conditions are met:

(1) The pesticide is currently registered by the United States Environmental Protection Agency pursuant to Section 3 of the Federal Insecticide, Fungicide, and Rodenticide Act (7 U.S.C. Sec. 136a) for the use specified in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (5).

(2) The active ingredient of the pesticide was previously registered under Section 18 of the Federal Insecticide, Fungicide, and Rodenticide Act (7 U.S.C. Sec. 136p) in order to respond to an emergency pest control problem.

(3) The applicant demonstrates to the department that the pesticide qualifies for registration pursuant to Section 12815 and the department determines that it is probable that the pesticide will receive registration pursuant to this division within one year.

(4) The applicant for emergency registration submits to the director all data required for registration pursuant to this division and the regulations adopted pursuant to this division.

(5) The director makes both of the following findings based on substantial evidence:

(A) The use of the pesticide during the period of emergency registration will not pose a potential significant risk to public health or safety or to the environment. In making this finding, the director shall review the risks associated with the use of the pesticide and determine if those risks are significant given the limitations that will be imposed on the use of the pesticide during the emergency registration period.

(B) The emergency registration of the pesticide is necessary in order to effectively respond to an emergency pest control problem. For purposes of this subparagraph, an emergency pest control problem shall be deemed to exist if the director finds that a pest infestation is present in the state for which no feasible pest control method is available that is a reasonable alternative to the use of the pesticide for which the emergency registration is requested. In making a determination pursuant to this subparagraph, the director shall identify the pest infestation that is the subject of the emergency, describe the pest control methods that have been demonstrated as ineffective against the infestation or that are otherwise not reasonable alternatives, and summarize the evidence that demonstrates that the pesticide for which emergency registration has been requested is efficacious against the pest infestation.

(b) At the same time as the director issues a certificate of emergency registration for a pesticide pursuant to this section, the director shall establish limitations on the use of the pesticide that the director determines are necessary to prevent a potential significant risk to human health or safety or the environment. The director shall limit the use of any pesticide granted a certificate of emergency registration to the control of the emergency pest infestation described in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (5) of subdivision (a).

(c) A certificate of emergency registration may be issued for a period not to exceed one year and may be renewed one time only.

(d) A certificate of emergency registration may not be renewed unless the director does all of the following:

(1) Publishes a notice that an application for renewal of the certificate of emergency registration has been received.

(2) Makes all of the following findings:

(A) That the findings made by the director in support of the certificate of emergency registration pursuant to paragraph (5) of subdivision (a) remain valid.

(B) That there are no indications that the pesticide, when used in accordance with applicable label instructions and the limitations established pursuant to subdivision (b), poses a significant risk to worker safety and health. The director shall base this finding on a review of the data required for registration pursuant to this division, experience with the use of the pesticide during the period the certificate of emergency registration was in effect, and any other information the director has required the applicant to submit or received from the applicant or any other person.

(C) That the failure to complete the registration of the pesticide during the period the certificate of emergency registration was in effect is due to circumstances that were not under the control of the applicant, and that the data required for registration pursuant to this division is complete and meets all of the requirements of this division and the regulations adopted pursuant to this division.

(3) Convenes a workshop, if one is requested by any interested or aggrieved person, concerning the reasons for the renewal of the certificate of emergency registration. The director shall review information and comments provided by persons who attend the workshop and take that information and those comments into account in determining if the certificate of emergency registration may be renewed.

(e) The director shall immediately revoke any certificate of emergency registration issued pursuant to this section if either of the following occurs:

(1) The United States Environmental Protection Agency suspends or cancels the registration of the pesticide or the particular use of the active ingredient in the pesticide that allows it to be used in the emergency pest infestation described in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (5) of subdivision (a).

(2) The director determines during a subsequent review of data required for registration pursuant to this division that the use of the pesticide will pose a potential significant risk to the public health or safety or to the environment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 361, Sec. 49.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

12836.

(a) The director, by January 1, 1999, shall implement a program for the expedited registration of or for the expedited amendment of the registration of any pesticide classified by the United States Environmental Protection Agency as a “public health pesticide” or “antimicrobial pesticide” and that is determined by the director to have human health protection benefits that warrant eligibility for expedited processing. Nothing in this section limits the director’s authority to provide expedited registration for any other pesticide product.

(b) For the purposes of this section, “expedited registration” and “expedited amendment of the registration” mean that the director shall review an application for registration or for amendment of a registration concurrently in time with the review conducted by the United States Environmental Protection Agency. This section shall not be construed to require or authorize modification of any guidelines, protocols, or standards applicable to the review of an application for registration.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 428, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

12836.5.

The director shall accept applications for registration of pesticide products containing a new active ingredient concurrently with the application to the United States Environmental Protection Agency. The application for registration must include all data and information that meet the requirements of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 612, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

12836.6.

The director shall, with the assistance of the Legislative Analyst, conduct a study to consider more carefully the consequences of data-sharing agreements required under Section 12811.5 and the volume of high-hazard pesticides sold in California. The report shall be submitted to the Legislature no later than December 31, 2008.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 93, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

12837.

(a) The director may waive the submission or review, or both, of efficacy data developed by a registrant as a prerequisite for registration for any antimicrobial pesticide product if all of the following conditions have been met with respect to each antimicrobial pesticide product:

(1) The director finds that the United States Environmental Protection Agency’s guidelines, protocols, and standards of review in existence at the time the product was reviewed by the United States Environmental Protection Agency are consistent with, and no less stringent than, California guidelines, protocols, and standards and generally accepted scientific practices.

(2) The director finds that, with respect to the particular antimicrobial pesticide product reviewed under this section, the United States Environmental Protection Agency actually implemented the guidelines, protocols, and standards of review for which the director made the required finding pursuant to paragraph (1). In making this finding, the director may request any relevant studies or documentation from the registrant.

(b) Nothing in this section shall be construed as a limitation on the director to request or to review any efficacy data or studies or to subject any product to testing, at any time.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 428, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

12838.

(a) On or before July 1, 2018, the department shall issue a determination with respect to its reevaluation of neonicotinoids.

(b) (1) Within two years after making the determination specified in subdivision (a), the department shall adopt any control measures necessary to protect pollinator health.

(2) If the department is unable to adopt the necessary control measures within two years as required in paragraph (1), the department shall submit a report to the appropriate committees of the Legislature setting forth the reasons the requirement of paragraph (1) has not been met.

(3) The department shall update the report submitted to the appropriate committees of the Legislature pursuant to paragraph (2) every year until the department adopts the necessary control measures specified in paragraph (1).

(c) (1) For purposes of this subdivision, the following definitions apply:

(A) “Cumulative impacts of exposure” means the collective impact of exposure to two or more neonicotinoid pesticides.

(B) “Neonicotinoid pesticide” means a pesticide containing acetamiprid, clothianidin, dinotefuran, imidacloprid, thiamethoxam, or any other chemical designated by the department as belonging to the neonicotinoid class of chemicals.

(2) Beginning January 1, 2025, a person shall not sell, possess, or use a pesticide containing one or more neonicotinoid pesticides
 for any use that is excluded from the definition of “agricultural use” in Section 11408 on nonproduction outdoor ornamental plants, trees, or turf, with the exception of use and possession by state certified applicators and sale by state licensed pest control dealers.

(3) The department shall evaluate, at a minimum, the potential impacts of the neonicotinoid pesticide uses described in paragraph (2) on pollinating insects, aquatic organisms, and human health, taking into account relevant routes of exposure, as follows:

(A) On or before January 1, 2024, the department shall issue a draft human health risk assessment of imidacloprid.

(B) On or before July 1, 2024, the department shall initiate a reevaluation of
 neonicotinoid pesticides relative to pollinating insects, aquatic organisms, and human health, taking into account relevant routes of exposure.

(C) On or before January 1, 2025, the department shall issue a final human health risk assessment for imidacloprid.

(D) On or before January 1, 2025, the department shall issue draft human health risk assessments for the neonicotinoid chemicals described in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) other than imidacloprid.

(E) On or before July 1, 2025, the department shall issue an evaluation of the impact of neonicotinoid pesticides on aquatic organisms.

(F) On or before January 1, 2026, the department shall issue final
 human health risk assessments for the neonicotinoid chemicals described in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) other than imidacloprid.

(G) On or before July 1, 2027, the department shall issue a determination with respect to the reevaluation of neonicotinoid pesticides on their impacts on pollinating insects, aquatic organisms, and human health.

(4) On or before July 1, 2029, the department shall adopt any necessary control measures for the use of neonicotinoid pesticides that are determined by the department to be necessary, based on the evaluations described in paragraph (3).

(5) If the department is unable to meet any deadline required in paragraph (3) or (4), the department shall submit a report to the appropriate
 committees of the Legislature setting forth the reasons the deadline or deadlines have not been met.

(6) In performing the evaluations described in paragraph (3), the department shall consider the cumulative impacts of exposure to multiple neonicotinoid pesticides unless the department can demonstrate with substantial evidence that one or more neonicotinoid pesticides do not share a common mechanism of toxicity and do not present risk of cumulative harm.

(7) The department is not required to conduct a reevaluation of any use of neonicotinoid pesticides for the protection of agricultural commodities, as defined in Section 6000 of Title 3 of the California Code of Regulations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 80, Sec. 52.   (SB 1525)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

12839.

(a) On and after July 1, 2027, the department shall meet the following timelines to review and evaluate, and issue final decisions on, applications to register new pesticide products or amend existing pesticide product registrations, as specified in this article, except as provided in subdivisions (b), (d), and (e).

(1) For review and evaluation of, and issuance of a final decision on, an application for registration of a new active ingredient, 30 months from the date of submittal of a complete application.

(2) For review and evaluation of, and issuance of a final decision on, an application for registration of a new product or letter of acceptance to amend an existing product registration, when
 previously evaluated data support registration or amendment and no supporting scientific data is required for review, six months from the date of submittal of a complete application.

(3) For review and evaluation of, and issuance of a final decision on, an application for registration of a new product or letter of acceptance to amend an existing product registration, when evaluation of data is required, 12 months from the date of submittal of a complete application.

(4) In cases where the submitted application for registration of a new product or amendment of an existing product registration does not include supporting scientific data for review, but the department subsequently determines that the application requires data evaluation, 12 months from the date of submittal of the required data.

(b) The department may
 toll the applicable timeline provided in subdivision (a) under any of the following circumstances:

(1) The applicant fails to correct a deficiency with the application identified by the department within a 15-business-day timeframe.

(2) An application requires United States Environmental Protection Agency approval.

(3) The applicant corrects a deficiency with the application, but also makes substantive changes to the product or label that exceeds correcting the deficiency.

(4) Nonpayment of a registration fee by the applicant for the certificate of registration.

(5) The application is reliant on data associated with another identical or substantially similar product submission undergoing
 registration review by the department.

(c) Upon the conclusion of a circumstance that was the basis for the department tolling an applicable timeline pursuant to subdivision (b), the tolling period shall end and the applicable timeline shall resume within 15 business days after the department became aware of the conclusion of the circumstance.

(d) If the department cannot meet an applicable timeline provided in subdivision (a), the director may extend the timeline for up to two 60-day periods by notifying the applicant in writing and specifying both of the following:

(1) The reasons why additional time is needed.

(2) The estimated number of days needed that would allow the director to complete the certificate of registration.

(e) In addition to subdivision (d), the director and the applicant may mutually agree, in writing, to additionally extend an applicable timeline provided in subdivision (a).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 67, Sec. 77.   (AB 1170)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

12840.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature that, when the department hires staff due to the mill increases described in Section 12841 and registration fee increases in 2024, the department prioritize hiring for positions within the pesticide registration branch.

(b) Beginning in 2025, the director, when requested by the appropriate policy committees of the Assembly and Senate, but no less than once every two years, shall appear before the appropriate policy committees of the Assembly and Senate to provide an update on the department’s performance, including, but not limited to, its performance completing timely registrations and reevaluations pursuant to this chapter, and any other information that the committees
 request.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 60, Sec. 16.   (AB 2113)   Effective July 2, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4.5. Assessments [12841. - 12847.]

12841.

(a) A person shall not sell for use in this state any pesticide products that have been registered by the director for which the mill assessment established by this article, and the regulations adopted pursuant to it, is not paid at the times specified in Section 12843.

(b) Except as provided in subdivision (d), every person who sells for use in this state a pesticide product that has been registered by the director shall pay to the director the applicable assessment. Those sales expressly include all sales made electronically, telephonically, or by any other means that result in a pesticide product being shipped to or used in this state. There is a
 rebuttable presumption that pesticide products that are sold or distributed into or within this state by any person are sold or distributed for use in this state.

(c) Upon application of a registrant, the director shall determine whether a fertilizer or paper product is used as a carrier for a pesticide, and is sold in combination, and whether the mill assessment under this article shall be on the pesticide value only, when the product is designed, developed, and manufactured, and sold primarily for other than a pesticide use. If the director finds that the combination product has such a major component and is designed, developed, manufactured, and sold primarily for other than a pesticide use, the assessment provided by this article shall be paid on the equivalent percentage of the sales price of the active ingredients of the
 pesticide product. The director shall establish this percentage of the sales price. The percentage shall be the ratio of that portion of the sales price attributable to the pesticide portion to the total sales price of the combination product.

(d) Assessments provided for in this article for sales of registered pesticides that are sold for use in this state shall be paid by the person or entity that first sold the pesticide for use in this state.

(e) It has been and continues to be the intent of the Legislature that this division requires the department to register all pesticides before their sale for use in this state and, except as otherwise provided by law, requires the department to regulate and control the use of pesticides in accordance with this division. Except as provided in
 Section 12841.1, the department shall continue to collect the assessment as provided in this article at the same rate on all registered agricultural and registered nonagricultural pesticides.

(f) (1) The mill assessment shall be paid at the following rates per dollar of sales for all sales of pesticides for use in this state:

(A) From July 1, 2024, to June 30, 2025, inclusive, the rate shall be 24.5 mills
 ($0.0245) per dollar sales of all sales of registered pesticides for use in this state plus any additional assessment authorized by Section 12841.1.

(B) From July 1, 2025, to June 30, 2026, inclusive, the rate shall be 27 mills ($0.027) per dollar sales of all sales of registered pesticides for use in this state plus any additional assessment authorized by Section 12841.1.

(C) From July 1, 2026, to June 30, 2027, inclusive, the rate shall be 29 mills ($0.029) per dollar sales of all sales of registered pesticides for use in this state plus any additional
 assessment authorized by Section 12841.1.

(D) On and after July 1, 2027, the rate shall be 30 mills ($0.030) per dollar sales of all sales of registered pesticides for use in this state plus any additional assessment authorized by Section 12841.1.

(2) The regulations adopted pursuant to this section, or any amendment thereto, shall be adopted by the director in accordance with Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code. However, the adoption, amendment, readoption, or repeal of these regulations shall be considered by the Office of Administrative Law as an emergency, and necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace,
 health, safety, and general welfare. Notwithstanding any other law, the regulations shall remain in effect until amended by the director. The director shall make available to the public, upon the adoption of an emergency regulation establishing a new rate, the information on which the director has calculated, based, or determined the new rate.

(g) The revenue collected pursuant to this section shall be deposited into the Department of Pesticide Regulation Fund and distributed as follows:

(1) Notwithstanding Sections 2282 and 12784, the director shall pay, in accordance with the criteria set forth in Section 12844, the following amounts to the counties as reimbursement for costs incurred by the counties in the administration and enforcement of Division 6 (commencing with Section
 11401), this chapter, Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 14001), Chapter 3.4 (commencing with Section 14090), and Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 14101):

(A) From January 1, 1998, to March 31, 1998, inclusive, five-eighths of the money received during that period pursuant to this section.

(B) From April 1, 1998, to June 30, 2004, an amount equal to the revenue derived from 6 mills ($0.006) per dollar of sales for all pesticide sales for use in this state.

(C) Beginning July 1, 2004, an amount equal to the revenue derived from 7.6 mills ($0.0076) per dollar of sales for all pesticide sales for use in this state.

(2) All funds not otherwise
 distributed pursuant to this subdivision shall remain in the Department of Pesticide Regulation Fund and shall be available for expenditure, upon appropriation by the Legislature, to support the department’s
 operations.

(h) For purposes of this section, “active ingredient” means any active ingredient that is required to be stated on the label on any registered pesticide under Section 12883.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 60, Sec. 17.   (AB 2113)   Effective July 2, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

12841.1.

(a) The director may collect an assessment, in addition to the mill assessment collected pursuant to Section 12841, for all pesticide sales for use in this state except for sales for use in this state of pesticides labeled solely for home, industrial, or institutional use. The director may only collect up to an additional 1.04 mills ($0.00104) per dollar of sales, in addition to the rate established pursuant to Section 12841, if necessary to fund, or augment the funding for, an appropriation to the Department of Food and Agriculture to provide pesticide consultation to the department pursuant to Section 11454.2. The necessity of this additional assessment shall be determined by the Secretary of Food and
 Agriculture, in consultation with the director, on an annual basis after consideration of all other revenue sources, including any reserves, that may be appropriated for this purpose. The secretary’s written determination, including a request for a specified additional assessment and the basis for that request, shall be provided to the director by a time and in a manner prescribed by the director.

(b) The revenue collected pursuant to this section shall be deposited monthly into a separate account in the Department of Food and Agriculture Fund. These revenues shall be expended only by the Department of Food and Agriculture, upon appropriation by the Legislature, to provide consultation to the department pursuant to Section 11454.2. Funds shall not be expended before the execution of a memorandum of understanding pursuant to
 subdivision (b) of Section 11454.2. The consultation activities to be undertaken by the Department of Food and Agriculture are limited solely to those specifically authorized in the memorandum of understanding executed pursuant to Section 11454.2. These funds shall not be expended for scientific risk assessment activities. The department shall be reimbursed from the Department of Food and Agriculture Fund for the department’s revenue collection activities. If the director determines that a person is entitled to a refund of mill assessment funds that were collected pursuant to this section, the director shall inform the Secretary of Food and Agriculture of the amount of the refund due, which shall be reimbursed from the Department of Food and Agriculture Fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 60, Sec. 18.   (AB 2113)   Effective July 2, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

12841.2.

(a) The Department of Pesticide Regulation shall create a program to conduct outreach and education activities for worker safety, environmental safety, school safety, and proper pesticide handling and use, to include, but not be limited to, the following issues and criteria:

(1) The program shall encompass all communities, including urban, rural, and suburban communities.

(2) All potential exposure opportunities, including household, industrial, and agricultural uses.

(3) Rights and procedures of workers and those potentially exposed to pesticides and how to file confidential complaints.

(b) The program shall be conducted in accordance with the department’s environmental justice guidelines.

(c) The director shall appoint an advisory committee of interested stakeholders to provide input on the development and implementation of the program.

(d) This program shall compliment and not replace other outreach efforts currently in place not dealing with the issues addressed within this program.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 741, Sec. 67.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

12841.3.

(a) Notwithstanding Sections 2282, 12784, and 12841, the director shall pay from the revenue collected from the mill assessment in the Department of Pesticide Regulation Fund an amount not to exceed the revenue derived from 0.5 mill ($0.0005) per dollar of sales for all pesticide sales for use in this state to counties in nonattainment areas to assist those counties in the administration and enforcement of restrictions on the use of field fumigants pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 14001) and the regulations issued pursuant to it. These funds shall be in addition to the funds distributed pursuant to Section 12841 and shall be distributed to the counties in accordance with the criteria set forth in subdivisions (c) and (d).

(b) As used in this section, “nonattainment area” means an area designated in Section 81.305 of Title 40 of the Code of Federal Regulations for the purpose of air quality planning within the chart titled “California - Ozone (1-Hour Standard).”

(c) The funds available for payment pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be apportioned based on the following criteria:

(1) A minimum of fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) shall be apportioned to each county in a nonattainment area.

(2) The remaining amount shall be apportioned to the counties based on fumigant related workload, which may include, but is not limited to, both of the following:

(3) The number of restricted use material permits issued for fumigants.

(4) The number of field fumigant applications in each county to the total for all counties within all nonattainment areas during the previous fiscal year.

(d) Only counties within a nonattainment area for which the Department of Pesticide Regulation has established a fumigant emission limit pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 14001), and the regulations issued pursuant to it, in the current or the previous fiscal year shall receive payment of the amount apportioned pursuant to the criteria set forth in subdivision (c).

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 760, Sec. 1.   Effective September 30, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

12841.4.

(a) Every registrant of any production agricultural- or structural-use pesticide product sold for use in this state that is packaged in rigid, nonrefillable, high-density polyethylene (HDPE) containers of 55 gallons or less shall establish a recycling program, or demonstrate participation in a recycling program to ensure HDPE containers are recycled. Container recycling shall comply with the American National Standards Institute American Society of Agriculture and Biological Engineers Standard S596, entitled Recycling Plastic Containers from Pesticides and Pesticide-Related Products, as published in February 2006. The records required by these standards shall be maintained for four years and shall be subject to audit by the director.

(b) A registrant who is required to establish or participate in a recycling program pursuant to this section shall provide to the director, at least annually, a document certifying that this requirement has been met.

(c) (1) The director may adopt regulations to carry out the purposes of this section. Upon a federal pesticide container recycling program being adopted, the director may adopt regulations to conform to the federal program.

(2) It is the intent of the Legislature in enacting this section that any regulatory standards adopted by the department shall be at least as stringent as those standards referred to in subdivision (a).

(d) The department shall estimate a recycling rate for pesticide containers and propose suggestions for program improvements and post this information annually on its internet website.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 60, Sec. 19.   (AB 2113)   Effective July 2, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

12842.

Every person who sells for use in this state any pesticide products that have been registered by the director shall maintain in this state, or with the director’s permission at another location, an accurate record of all pesticide transactions for four years. The records are subject to audit by the director and shall clearly demonstrate proof of payment of all applicable assessments for each registered pesticide product sold for use in this state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 60, Sec. 20.   (AB 2113)   Effective July 2, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

12843.

The payments required by this article, together with a return in a form prescribed by the director, shall be made quarterly one calendar month after March 31, June 30, September 30, and December 31 of each year. For any delinquency in making a return, or any deficiency in payment, the director shall add to the delinquent payment a penalty of 10 percent of the amount that is due.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 695, Sec. 24.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

12844.

The director and the county agricultural commissioners shall jointly develop regulations specifying the criteria to be used in allocating pesticide mill assessment funds to the counties based upon each county’s pest control activities, costs, workload, and performance. After providing public notice, the director shall adopt those regulations. The criteria to be used in allocating the funds to counties shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(a) The effectiveness of the pesticide use enforcement program in each county.

(b) The number, comprehensiveness, and effectiveness of pest control inspections performed in each county.

(c) The number of licensed pest control dealers located in each county. The number of licensed agricultural pest control advisers, pest control businesses, and pest control aircraft pilots registered in each county. The number of structural pest control operators providing notice of work to each county.

(d) The work hours expended in each county by county personnel who are licensed, or working under the supervision of county personnel licensed, in pesticide regulation or environmental monitoring and investigation.

(e) The total amount of dollars expended by each county relating to pesticide regulatory activities.

(f) The total number of private applicator certificate holders in each county.

(g) The total pounds of pesticides reported used in each county.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 695, Sec. 26.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

12844.5.

Notwithstanding Section 12784, the funds paid to the counties under Section 12844 shall also be considered as reimbursement for costs incurred by the counties in the administration and enforcement of Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 15201).

(History: Added by renumbering Section 12845 (as added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 766) by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1266, Sec. 14.)
-------------------------------------------

12845.

(a) The director may adopt regulations that require persons subject to this article to provide information determined by the director to be necessary to enable the director to perform the audit authorized pursuant to Section 12842 and to carry out other powers or duties under this division.

(b) The regulations adopted pursuant to this section may include, but are not limited to, a requirement that a person subject to this article provide the director with information on the quarterly dollar sales of each registered pesticide sold for use in this state and the quarterly volume of each registered pesticide sold for use in this state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 695, Sec. 27.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

12847.
